New Jersey, session 221, A3241.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Intervention means specific actions implemented by a school in response to student suicidal behavior, including: student supervision; notification of parents or guardians; crisis-response protocols; processes for immediate mental health assessment or emergency services; and school re-entry procedures following a student mental health crisis. Postvention means planned support and interventions a school implements after a suicide attempt or suicide of a student or any employee of a school district that are designed to: reduce the risk of suicide contagion; provide support for affected students and any employees of a school district; address the social stigma associated with suicide; and disseminate factual information about suicide. Prevention means specific actions a school implements to recognize and reduce suicidal behavior, including: identifying risk and protective factors for suicide and suicide warning signs; establishing a process by which students are referred to a behavioral health provider for help; making available school-based and community-based mental health supports; providing the location of available online and community suicide prevention resources, including local crisis centers and hotlines; and adopting policies and protocols regarding school safety, and crisis response. 2.    a.  A board of education of a school district shall adopt a policy on student suicide prevention.  When developing the policy, a board of education shall review the model policy established by the Commissioner of Education pursuant to subsection b. of this section and consult with school and community stakeholders, school-employed mental health professionals, and suicide prevention experts.  A board of education shall have local control over the content of the policy, except that the policy shall, at a minimum: (1)   address procedures relating to suicide prevention, intervention, and postvention; and (2)   recognize the needs of high-risk groups. b.    To assist boards of education in developing policies for student suicide prevention, the commissioner shall develop a model policy, applicable to grades kindergarten through 12.  The model policy shall be updated as the commissioner deems necessary. c.     A board of education shall: (1)  post the policy on the boards Internet website; and (2)  notify students, parents, and guardians that the policy is available on the boards Internet website. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply in the first full school year following the date of enactment.